Illinois, session 104th, SB2315.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Build Illinois Bond Act is amended by 5changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 425/4)  (from Ch. 127, par. 2804)7    Sec. 4. Purposes of Bonds. Bonds shall be issued for the 8following purposes and in the approximate amounts as set forth 9below:10    (a) $4,741,094,533 for the expenses of issuance and sale 11of Bonds, including bond discounts, and for planning, 12engineering, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, 13development, improvement, demolition, and extension of the 14public infrastructure in the State of Illinois, including: the 15making of loans or grants to local governments for waste 16disposal systems, water and sewer line extensions and water 17distribution and purification facilities, rail or air or water 18port improvements, gas and electric utility extensions, 19publicly owned industrial and commercial sites, buildings used 20for public administration purposes and other public 21infrastructure capital improvements; the making of loans or 22grants to units of local government for financing and 23construction of wastewater facilities, including grants to   SB2315- 2 -LRB104 10464 BDA 20539 b1serve unincorporated areas; refinancing or retiring bonds 2issued between January 1, 1987 and January 1, 1990 by home rule 3municipalities, debt service on which is provided from a tax 4imposed by home rule municipalities prior to January 1, 1990 5on the sale of food and drugs pursuant to Section 8-11-1 of the 6Home Rule Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax Act or Section 78-11-5 of the Home Rule Municipal Service Occupation Tax Act; 8the making of deposits not to exceed $70,000,000 in the 9aggregate into the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund to 10provide assistance in accordance with the provisions of Title 11IV-A of the Environmental Protection Act; the planning, 12engineering, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, 13alteration, expansion, extension and improvement of highways, 14bridges, structures separating highways and railroads, rest 15areas, interchanges, access roads to and from any State or 16local highway and other transportation improvement projects 17which are related to economic development activities; the 18making of loans or grants for planning, engineering, 19rehabilitation, improvement or construction of rail and 20transit facilities; the planning, engineering, acquisition, 21construction, reconstruction and improvement of watershed, 22drainage, flood control, recreation and related improvements 23and facilities, including expenses related to land and 24easement acquisition, relocation, control structures, channel 25work and clearing and appurtenant work; the planning, 26engineering, acquisition, construction, reconstruction and   SB2315- 3 -LRB104 10464 BDA 20539 b1improvement of State facilities and related infrastructure; 2the making of Park and Recreational Facilities Construction 3(PARC) grants; the making of grants to units of local 4government for community development capital projects; the 5making of grants for improvement and development of zoos and 6park district field houses and related structures; and the 7making of grants for improvement and development of Navy Pier 8and related structures.9    (b) $3,554,636,967 for fostering economic development and 10increased employment and fostering the well being of the 11citizens of Illinois through community development, including: 12the making of grants for improvement and development of 13McCormick Place and related structures; the planning and 14construction of a microelectronics research center, including 15the planning, engineering, construction, improvement, 16renovation and acquisition of buildings, equipment and related 17utility support systems; the making of loans to businesses and 18investments in small businesses; acquiring real properties for 19industrial or commercial site development; acquiring, 20rehabilitating and reconveying industrial and commercial 21properties for the purpose of expanding employment and 22encouraging private and other public sector investment in the 23economy of Illinois; the payment of expenses associated with 24siting the Superconducting Super Collider Particle Accelerator 25in Illinois and with its acquisition, construction, 26maintenance, operation, promotion and support; the making of   SB2315- 4 -LRB104 10464 BDA 20539 b1loans for the planning, engineering, acquisition, 2construction, improvement and conversion of facilities and 3equipment which will foster the use of Illinois coal; the 4payment of expenses associated with the promotion, 5establishment, acquisition and operation of small business 6incubator facilities and agribusiness research facilities, 7including the lease, purchase, renovation, planning, 8engineering, construction and maintenance of buildings, 9utility support systems and equipment designated for such 10purposes and the establishment and maintenance of centralized 11support services within such facilities; the making of grants 12for transportation electrification infrastructure projects 13that promote use of clean and renewable energy; the making of 14capital expenditures and grants for broadband development and 15for a statewide broadband deployment grant program; the making 16of grants to public entities and private persons and entities 17for community development capital projects; the making of 18grants to public entities and private persons and entities for 19capital projects in the context of grant programs focused on 20assisting economically depressed areas, expanding affordable 21housing, supporting the provision of human services, 22supporting emerging technology enterprises, fostering the 23advancement of quantum information science and technology, and 24supporting minority owned businesses; and the making of grants 25or loans to units of local government for Urban Development 26Action Grant and Housing Partnership programs.  SB2315- 5 -LRB104 10464 BDA 20539 b1    (c) $2,785,076,600 for the development and improvement of 2educational, scientific, technical and vocational programs and 3facilities and the expansion of health and human services for 4all citizens of Illinois, including: the making of grants to 5school districts and not-for-profit organizations for early 6childhood construction projects pursuant to Section 5-300 of 7the School Construction Law; the making of grants to 8educational institutions for educational, scientific, 9technical and vocational program equipment and facilities; the 10making of grants to museums for equipment and facilities; the 11making of construction and improvement grants and loans to 12public libraries and library systems; the making of grants and 13loans for planning, engineering, acquisition and construction 14of a new State central library in Springfield; the planning, 15engineering, acquisition and construction of an animal and 16dairy sciences facility; the planning, engineering, 17acquisition and construction of a campus and all related 18buildings, facilities, equipment and materials for Richland 19Community College; the acquisition, rehabilitation and 20installation of equipment and materials for scientific and 21historical surveys; the making of grants or loans for 22distribution to eligible vocational education instructional 23programs for the upgrading of vocational education programs, 24school shops and laboratories, including the acquisition, 25rehabilitation and installation of technical equipment and 26materials; the making of grants or loans for distribution to   SB2315- 6 -LRB104 10464 BDA 20539 b1eligible local educational agencies for the upgrading of math 2and science instructional programs, including the acquisition 3of instructional equipment and materials; miscellaneous 4capital improvements for universities and community colleges 5including the planning, engineering, construction, 6reconstruction, remodeling, improvement, repair and 7installation of capital facilities and costs of planning, 8supplies, equipment, materials, services, and all other 9required expenses; the making of grants or loans for repair, 10renovation and miscellaneous capital improvements for 11privately operated colleges and universities and community 12colleges, including the planning, engineering, acquisition, 13construction, reconstruction, remodeling, improvement, repair 14and installation of capital facilities and costs of planning, 15supplies, equipment, materials, services, and all other 16required expenses; and the making of grants or loans for 17distribution to local governments for hospital and other 18health care facilities including the planning, engineering, 19acquisition, construction, reconstruction, remodeling, 20improvement, repair and installation of capital facilities and 21costs of planning, supplies, equipment, materials, services 22and all other required expenses.23    (d) $277,873,000 for protection, preservation, restoration 24and conservation of environmental and natural resources, 25including: the making of grants to soil and water conservation 26districts for the planning and implementation of conservation   SB2315- 7 -LRB104 10464 BDA 20539 b1practices and for funding contracts with the Soil Conservation 2Service for watershed planning; the making of grants to units 3of local government for the capital development and 4improvement of recreation areas, including planning and 5engineering costs, sewer projects, including planning and 6engineering costs and water projects, including planning and 7engineering costs, and for the acquisition of open space 8lands, including the acquisition of easements and other 9property interests of less than fee simple ownership; the 10making of grants to units of local government, including 11counties and park districts, through the Illinois Green 12Infrastructure Grant Program to protect water quality, and 13mitigate flooding, and restore and protect shorelines in the 14State; the acquisition and related costs and development and 15management of natural heritage lands, including natural areas 16and areas providing habitat for endangered species and nongame 17wildlife, and buffer area lands; the acquisition and related 18costs and development and management of habitat lands, 19including forest, wildlife habitat and wetlands; and the 20removal and disposition of hazardous substances, including the 21cost of project management, equipment, laboratory analysis, 22and contractual services necessary for preventative and 23corrective actions related to the preservation, restoration 24and conservation of the environment, including deposits not to 25exceed $60,000,000 in the aggregate into the Hazardous Waste 26Fund and the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund for improvements   SB2315- 8 -LRB104 10464 BDA 20539 b1in accordance with the provisions of Titles V and XVII of the 2Environmental Protection Act.3    (e) The amount specified in paragraph (a) above shall 4include an amount necessary to pay reasonable expenses of each 5issuance and sale of the Bonds, as specified in the related 6Bond Sale Order (hereinafter defined).7    (f) Any unexpended proceeds from any sale of Bonds which 8are held in the Build Illinois Bond Fund may be used to redeem, 9purchase, advance refund, or defease any Bonds outstanding.10(Source: P.A. 103-7, eff. 7-1-23; 103-591, eff. 7-1-24.)